Hawaii statutes.
[§21E-3] Meetings and attendance of quorum.
The members of the committee shall meet at times and places as specified by a
call of the co-chairpersons or a majority of the committee. The committee
shall prescribe rules for its own management and government. Six members of
the committee shall constitute a quorum, and a quorum may exercise all the
power and authority conferred on the committee. [L 1990, c 127, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next